Georgia, session 2025_26, HB681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 12 of Title 19 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to name changes,
is amended by revising subsections (a) and (c) of Code Section 19-12-1, relating to petition
for name change, request by victim of family violence or human trafficking, notice of filing,
and consent of minor's parents or guardian, as follows:
"(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Abandoned' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 15-11-2.
(2) 'Child' means an unemancipated individual who is under 18 years of age.
(3) 'Family violence' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 19-13-1.
(4) 'Human trafficking' means an offense provided for under Code Section 16-5-46."
H. B. 681
- 1 -

LC 48 1538
"(c)(1) When a name change is requested by a petitioner who alleges to be a victim of
family violence or human trafficking, such petitioner may petition the court to file his or
her petition to change his or her name under seal.
(2) If the court determines that the petitioner is a victim of family violence or human
trafficking authorizes that such petition be kept under seal, the court may issue an order
waiving the requirements of publication as set forth in subsection (d) of this Code section.
If the court determines that such filing shall be allowed to proceed under seal and
otherwise waives the other requirements of this Code section, it may hear and determine
all of the matters raised in such petition and render a final judgment thereon.
(3) After issuing an order under paragraph (2) of this subsection, the court may later
unseal a petition for name change or order the petitioner to file a redacted version of such
petition for the public record.
(4) If the court determines that the petitioner is not a victim of family violence or human
trafficking, the The underlying petition for name change shall not be heard until this Code
section has been complied with in full.
(5) The court shall retain all filings made under seal as part of the record."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 681
- 2 -